Washington statutes.
RCW 23.95.500

Governing law.

(1) This chapter does not authorize this state to regulate the organization or internal affairs of a foreign entity registered to do business in this state, or govern the liability that a person has as an interest holder or governor for a debt, obligation, or other liability of the foreign entity.

(2) A foreign entity is not precluded from registering to do business in this state because of any difference between the law of the entity's jurisdiction of formation and the law of this state.

(3) Registration of a foreign entity to do business in this state does not authorize the foreign entity to engage in any activity or exercise any power that a domestic entity of the same type may not engage in or exercise in this state. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter or other applicable law of this state, a foreign entity is subject to the same duties, restrictions, penalties, and liabilities now or later imposed on a domestic entity of the same type.

[ 2015 c 176 s 1501.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.